Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2534
County board; adopt personnel policies and procedures.

The county board of any county with a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants may adopt policies and procedures pursuant to sections 23-2534 to 23-2544 which concern employee hiring, advancement, training, career development, position classification, salary administration, fringe benefits, discharge, and other related activities.

Laws 1994, LB 212, § 1.